Rhode Island statutes. Title 18 Fiduciaries
Chapter 5 Common Trust Funds

18-5-1.
Establishment by banks and trust companies authorized.

Any trust company or national banking association qualified to act as a fiduciary in this state may establish one or more common trust funds for the purpose of investment and reinvestment of money received and held by the trust company or national banking association as fiduciary or cofiduciary, and as the fiduciary or cofiduciary it may invest funds which it lawfully holds for investment in interests or participations in one or more common trust funds established by it, if the investment is not expressly prohibited by the instrument, judgment, decree, or order creating the fiduciary relationship and if, in the case of cofiduciaries, it procures the consent of its cofiduciary or cofiduciaries to the investment.

Any trust company or national banking association qualified to act as a fiduciary in this state may invest funds which it holds in a fiduciary or cofiduciary capacity in any common trust fund established by any affiliate, if the investment is not expressly prohibited by the instrument, judgment, decree, or order creating the fiduciary relationship and if, in the case of cofiduciaries, it procures the consent of its cofiduciary or cofiduciaries to the investment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3839, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

18-5-1

; P.L. 1988, ch. 306, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 95, § 1.

18-5-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, “affiliate” of a trust company or national banking association means a member of an affiliated group connected through stock ownership with a common parent corporation which directly or indirectly owns stock possessing at least eighty percent (80%) of the total voting power and at least eighty percent (80%) of the total value of stock of each member of the affiliated group other than the common parent corporation.

“Common trust fund” means a fund maintained by a bank or trust company exclusively for the collective investment and reinvestment of money contributed to the fund by the bank or trust company in its capacity as a trustee, executor, administrator, or guardian, or as a cotrustee, coexecutor, coadministrator, or coguardian.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3839, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

18-5-2

; P.L. 1963, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 306, § 1.

18-5-3.
Property tax on assets.

Real estate and tangible personal property constituting assets of a common trust fund shall be taxed to the owner of the assets in the same manner as otherwise required by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3839, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

18-5-3

.

18-5-4.
Exemption of funds from taxation generally.

Except as provided in §

18-5-3

, no common trust fund nor any asset of the fund, nor any trust company or national banking association by reason of its ownership or operation of the fund or asset, shall be subject to any tax now or subsequently levied, assessed, or imposed by the state of Rhode Island, or by any city, town, or other political subdivision of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3839, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

18-5-4

; P.L. 1969, ch. 197, art. 7, § 2.

18-5-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3839, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 1969, ch. 197, art. 7, § 3.

18-5-6.
Relationships to which chapter applicable.

This chapter shall apply to fiduciary relationships in existence on May 2, 1956, or thereafter established.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3839, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

18-5-6

.

18-5-7.
Severability.

This chapter is declared to be severable, and should any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstances be held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect the other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3839, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

18-5-7

.